Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1235.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(b) and (c)(2) of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 6111(B) AND (C)(2) AND 6115(A) OF TITLE 61 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 6111. Pennsylvania Parole Board.* * *(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of nine members who shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of a majority of the members of the Senate, and each of whom shall hold office for a term of six years or until that person's successor shall have been duly appointed and qualified, <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 but in no event more than [90 days] six months beyond the expiration of that person's appointed term.(c) Vacancies.--* * *(2) Whenever a board member's term expires, that member's position shall be immediately deemed a vacancy, and the Governor shall nominate a person to fill that membership position on the board [within 90 days of] not later than six months after the date of expiration, even if the member continues to remain on the board.* * *§ 6115. INCOMPATIBLE OFFICES AND REMOVAL.(A) GENERAL RULE.--THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL NOT HOLD ANY OTHER PUBLIC OFFICE [OR EMPLOYMENT NOR ENGAGE IN ANY BUSINESS, PROFESSION OR EMPLOYMENT DURING THEIR TERMS OF SERVICE AS MEMBERS THEREOF AND SHALL HOLD THEIR OFFICES DURING THE TERMS FOR WHICH THEY SHALL HAVE BEEN APPOINTED]. MEMBERS OF THE BOARD MAY NOT ENGAGE IN ANY BUSINESS, PROFESSION OR EMPLOYMENT DURING THEIR TERMS OF SERVICE AS MEMBERS UNLESS HE OR SHE RECEIVES PRIOR APPROVAL FROM THE OFFICE OF GENERAL COUNSEL THAT THE BUSINESS, PROFESSION OR EMPLOYMENT:(1) IS NOT INCOMPATIBLE WITH HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES; AND(2) DOES NOT CREATE A CONFLICT OF INTEREST WITH HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to members of the Pennsylvania Parole Board who hold that office on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days 20260SB1235PN1860 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IMMEDIATELY.20260SB1235PN1860 - 3 - <--1